apertium-en-sq.sq.dix
    <pardef n="fërk/oj__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oj</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojmë</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>osh</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oni</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojë</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojnë</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uakësha</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="adi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uakëshim</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="adi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uakëshe</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="adi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uakëshit</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="adi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uakësh</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="adi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uakëshin</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="adi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uakam</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="adp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uakemi</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="adp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uake</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="adp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uakeni</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="adp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uaka</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="adp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uakan</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="adp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oni</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e i="yes">
        <p>
          <l>oj</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ofsha</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="opt"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ofshim</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="opt"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ofsh</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="opt"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ofshi</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="opt"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oftë</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="opt"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ofshin</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="opt"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uar</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oja</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onim</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oje</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onit</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onte</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onin</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oj</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojmë</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oni</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojnë</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ova</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uam</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ove</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uat</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oi</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uan</l>
          <r>oj<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="akreditoj"><i>akredit</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="anuloj"><i>anul</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="autorizoj"><i>autoriz</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bllokoj"><i>bllok</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cërkoj"><i>cërk</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="delegoj"><i>deleg</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="diskreditoj"><i>diskredit</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dëgjoj"><i>dëgj</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ekzekutoj"><i>ekzekut</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="farkëtoj"><i>farkët</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="frekuentoj"><i>frekuent</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="garantoj"><i>garant</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="grushtoj"><i>grusht</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hipnotizoj"><i>hipnotiz</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inkurajoj"><i>inkuraj</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="karmoj"><i>karm</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="konkurroj"><i>konkurr</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kryqëzoj"><i>kryqëz</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="labërgoj"><i>labërg</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="limoj"><i>lim</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="madhështoj"><i>madhësht</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mjekoj"><i>mjek</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mëshiroj"><i>mëshir</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ngazëlloj"><i>ngazëll</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ofendoj"><i>ofend</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="parfumoj"><i>parfum</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="planifikoj"><i>planifik</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="promovoj"><i>promov</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="përmirësoj"><i>përmirës</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="qytetëroj"><i>qytetër</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="riafirmoj"><i>riafirm</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rigjallëroj"><i>rigjallër</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rimoj"><i>rim</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rirreshtoj"><i>rirresht</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rrotulloj"><i>rrotull</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sfidoj"><i>sfid</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="shkishëroj"><i>shkishër</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="shndërroj"><i>shndërr</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="shqiptoj"><i>shqipt</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sinkronizoj"><i>sinkroniz</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="strukturoj"><i>struktur</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tipizoj"><i>tipiz</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="trimëroj"><i>trimër</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verboj"><i>verb</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vështirësoj"><i>vështirës</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zhbiroj"><i>zhbir</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zvetënoj"><i>zvetën</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="çmobilizoj"><i>çmobiliz</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="afishoj"><i>afish</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="arbitroj"><i>arbitr</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bashkekzistoj"><i>bashkekzist</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="brumoj"><i>brum</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="debitoj"><i>debit</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dhëmbëzoj"><i>dhëmbëz</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dyfishoj"><i>dyfish</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="emetoj"><i>emet</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="filtroj"><i>filtr</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fushoj"><i>fush</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="grimcoj"><i>grimc</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hezitoj"><i>hezit</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="improvizoj"><i>improviz</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="investoj"><i>invest</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="keqadministroj"><i>keqadministr</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="konkretizoj"><i>konkretiz</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kromoj"><i>krom</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lexoj"><i>lex</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="malcoj"><i>malc</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="migroj"><i>migr</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mujshoj"><i>mujsh</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ngjëroj"><i>ngjër</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nënkuptoj"><i>nënkupt</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="parashikoj"><i>parashik</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="peshkoj"><i>peshk</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="populloj"><i>popull</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="proklamoj"><i>proklam</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="përplotësoj"><i>përplotës</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="redaktoj"><i>redakt</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rilexoj"><i>rilex</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ritransmetoj"><i>ritransmet</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sakicoj"><i>sakic</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="shkagoj"><i>shkag</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="shproletarizoj"><i>shproletariz</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="simbolizoj"><i>simboliz</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="thjeshtoj"><i>thjesht</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="valoj"><i>val</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zdrugoj"><i>zdrug</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="çlyrësoj"><i>çlyrës</i><par n="fërk/oj__vblex"/></e>
